Alaska, session 34, SB30.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 41.21.026(d) is amended to read: 06 (d) The department shall issue free of charge to a disabled veteran 07 [VETERANS] of this country a [AN ANNUAL] state park developed facility 08 parking and restroom and developed campsite permit that is valid for the life of 09 the permit holder. The permit shall allow the [A] disabled veteran to use a state park 10 developed campsite and the parking and restrooms of a developed facility for 11 personal recreation use without a charge or fee under (a)(2) or (10) of this section. 12 The department shall automatically renew a permit issued under this subsection 13 every five years upon receiving confirmation of the permit holder's mailing 14 address. While utilizing a developed campsite or the parking or restrooms of a 01 developed facility without charge under this subsection, the disabled veteran shall 02 comply with all other statutes or regulations pertaining to the use of the developed 03 campsite or facility. The department shall provide a form for use by a disabled veteran 04 when applying for a permit under this section. Not later than February 1 of each year, 05 the department shall prepare a report on the number of permits issued to disabled 06 veterans under this subsection during the previous calendar year and notify the 07 legislature that the report is available. 08 * Sec. 2. AS 41.21.026 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 09 (g) In this section, "disabled veteran" means a disabled person whose 10 disability was incurred or aggravated 11 (1) in the line of duty in the military service of the United States; or 12 (2) while serving in the Alaska Territorial Guard. 13 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.